Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 1 LEGISLATIVE AUDIT COMMITTEE - STATE AUDITOR
2-3-110.5. Fraud hotline - investigations - confidentiality - access to records - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Committee" means the legislative audit committee created in section 2-3-101 (1).

"Contracted individual" means an individual currently or formerly acting under a contract, purchase order, or other similar agreement for the procurement of goods and services with a state agency; except that "contracted individual" does not include individuals or entities that provide services or receive benefits under Title XIX or Title XXI of the federal "Social Security Act".

"Employee" means an individual currently or formerly employed by a state agency; except that "employee" does not include individuals or entities that provide services or receive benefits under Title XIX or Title XXI of the federal "Social Security Act".

"Fraud" means occupational fraud or the use of one's occupation for personal enrichment through the deliberate misuse or misapplication of the employing organization's resources or assets. The definition of fraud specified in this subsection (1)(d) is used exclusively for purposes of the fraud hotline to be administered by the state auditor in accordance with this section and shall not be construed to apply to any other section of the Colorado Revised Statutes.

"Fraud hotline" or "hotline" means the system created and maintained by the state auditor pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section.

"Hotline call" means a report of information to the fraud hotline regardless of whether such report is made by telephone, fax, email, or another internet-based format.

"Investigation" means an investigation of a report to the fraud hotline of an allegation of fraud committed by an employee or a contracted individual. "Investigation" does not constitute a criminal investigation.

"State agency" or "agency" means all departments, institutions, and agencies of state government, including the office of the governor, institutions of higher education, and the legislative and judicial departments of the state.

"State auditor" means the state auditor or his or her designee.

The state auditor shall establish and administer a telephone number, fax number, email address, mailing address, or internet-based form whereby any individual may report an allegation of fraud committed by an employee or a contracted individual.

The state auditor may request that an individual submitting an allegation to the fraud hotline provide his or her name and contact information, but no person who submits an allegation to the hotline is required to provide his or her name and contact information. In addition, in accordance with federal laws and regulations, nothing in this section permits an employee of a financial institution to disclose personally identifiable or confidential information when making a report to the hotline.

The state auditor shall not disclose publicly, or when making a referral to another state agency in accordance with subsection (3)(b) of this section, the identity of any individual who contacts the fraud hotline unless the individual grants the state auditor express permission to make such disclosure. The restrictions imposed by this subsection (2)(b)(II) shall not apply when the state auditor makes a disclosure to a law enforcement agency, a district attorney, or the attorney general, in connection with a criminal investigation, or to the department of health care policy and financing or the attorney general in accordance with subsection (3)(a)(II) of this section.

The state auditor is responsible for administering the hotline, including the screening of hotline calls and, in accordance with subsection (3)(b) of this section, consulting and coordinating with state agencies to refer allegations of fraud by an employee or a contracted individual that are reported to the hotline.

The state auditor shall staff the hotline with one or more individuals who possess professional knowledge and expertise in the areas of fraud prevention and detection, fraud examination, forensic accounting, or another related field. The state auditor may also contract with any private entity to assist in the execution of his or her powers and duties under this section. The state auditor shall consult and use accepted professional guidelines and best practices, such as those established by other state audit organizations or the association of certified fraud examiners, when developing internal operating policies and procedures for carrying out activities of his or her office in connection with the hotline.

The state auditor shall publicize the existence and purpose of the hotline on the official website of the office of the state auditor and through other means as determined by the state auditor.

The state auditor shall prepare and maintain workpapers for the purpose of documenting the activities of his or her office in connection with hotline calls and investigations.

All workpapers prepared or maintained by the state auditor in connection with hotline calls must be held as strictly confidential by the state auditor and not for public release. The restrictions imposed by this subsection (2)(f)(II) shall not prevent communication by and among the state auditor, a state agency, the governor, the committee, a law enforcement agency, a district attorney, or the attorney general in accordance with the requirements of this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all workpapers prepared or maintained by the state auditor in connection with hotline calls shall not constitute public records for purposes of the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24.

Upon receiving a hotline call, the state auditor shall conduct an initial screening of the call to determine whether the matter being reported constitutes an allegation of fraud committed by an employee or a contracted individual.
(3) (a) (I) Upon receiving a hotline call, the state auditor shall conduct an initial screening of the call to determine whether the matter being reported constitutes an allegation of fraud committed by an employee or a contracted individual.

The state auditor shall forward all hotline calls alleging fraud by a medicaid recipient to the department of health care policy and financing, all calls alleging fraud by a medicaid provider or contractor to the medicaid fraud control unit of the office of the attorney general, and all calls alleging fraud in violation of the "Colorado False Claims Act", part 12 of article 31 of title 24, to the attorney general unless the allegation relates to a state employee in the performance of the employee's duties.

If the state auditor determines through the initial screening that a hotline call constitutes an allegation of fraud committed by an employee or a contracted individual, the state auditor shall consult and coordinate with management or management's designee of the affected state agency or, in the case of alleged fraud involving a gubernatorial appointee, the governor's office for the purpose of referring the hotline call and any related workpapers to the affected agency. Upon receiving a referred hotline call from the state auditor, the state agency is responsible for determining and taking appropriate action to respond to the referred hotline call and reporting back to the state auditor in accordance with subsection (4) of this section. In determining appropriate action, the state agency may request either the assistance of the state auditor to participate in an investigation or request that the state auditor conduct the entire investigation.

When, at the request of a state agency, the state auditor either participates in or conducts an investigation of a hotline call pursuant to subsection (3)(b) of this section, the following additional requirements apply:

The state auditor has access at all times to all of the books, accounts, reports, vouchers, or other records or information maintained by the agency that are directly related to the scope of the investigation.

The state auditor shall report the results of the investigation to the head of the affected agency or, in the case of alleged fraud involving a gubernatorial appointee, to the governor's office. The state auditor shall also provide any workpapers prepared or maintained by the state auditor during the investigation.

If the investigation finds evidence that the amount of the alleged fraud exceeds one hundred thousand dollars, the state auditor shall also report the results of the investigation to the committee and, with the approval of the committee, to the governor.

If the investigation finds evidence of apparently illegal transactions or misuse or embezzlement of public funds or property, the state auditor shall immediately report the matter to a law enforcement agency, a district attorney, or the attorney general, as appropriate. The state auditor shall also provide any workpapers prepared or maintained by the state auditor during the investigation.

When a state agency is referred a hotline call by the state auditor pursuant to subsection (3)(b) of this section and has not requested that the state auditor either participate in or conduct the entire investigation, the state agency shall report back to the state auditor within ninety days on the disposition of the referral, including action the agency has taken to respond to the fraud allegation and the results of any subsequent investigation by the agency. If the state agency has not reached a disposition of the referred hotline call within ninety days, the agency shall report to the state auditor the current status of the referral as of the ninety-day deadline. This reporting requirement continues every ninety days thereafter until the agency has reached a disposition of the referred hotline call.

Commencing with state fiscal year 2018-19, the state auditor shall prepare an annual report to the committee summarizing, in the aggregate, activity relating to the fraud hotline during the preceding state fiscal year, such as the number, type, nature, and disposition of reports made to the hotline. The annual report shall not contain detailed information, confidential or otherwise, about any specific reports made to the hotline or that would enable the identification of either any specific individual involved in a matter reported to the hotline or any subsequent investigation. The annual report must be accessible to the public and posted on the official website of the office of the state auditor.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1223), ch. 243, p. 1000, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2022:

(3)(a)(II) amended, (HB 22-1119), ch. 394, p. 2797, § 4, effective August 10.

2-3-111. Office of state auditor - conduct audit of juvenile justice system - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 202, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective January 1, 1993. (See L. 91, p. 202.)

2-3-112. Prevention programs - programmatic review. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1157, § 1, effective January 1,1997.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 585, § 7, effective May 18.

2-3-113. Programs that receive tobacco settlement money - program review - definitions.

As used in this section:

"Health sciences facility" has the meaning set forth in section 26.5-3-503. For purposes of this section, "health sciences facility" includes any contractor or subcontractor engaged by the health sciences facility to assist in the implementation and monitoring of the nurse home visitor program established pursuant to part 5 of article 3 of title 26.5.

"Master settlement agreement" means the master settlement agreement, the smokeless tobacco master settlement agreement, and the consent decree approved and entered by the court in the case denominated State of Colorado, ex rel. Gale A. Norton, Attorney General v. R.J. Reynolds Tobacco Co.; American Tobacco Co., Inc.; Brown & Williamson Tobacco Corp.; Liggett & Myers, Inc.; Lorillard Tobacco Co., Inc.; Philip Morris, Inc.; United States Tobacco Co.; B.A.T. Industries, P.L.C.; The Council For Tobacco Research--U.S.A., Inc.; and Tobacco Institute, Inc., Case No. 97 CV 3432, in the district court for the city and county of Denver.

"Tobacco settlement program" means any program that receives appropriations from moneys received by the state pursuant to the master settlement agreement.

Beginning January 1, 2002, it is the duty of the state auditor to conduct or cause to be conducted program reviews and evaluations of the performance of each tobacco settlement program to determine whether the program is effectively and efficiently meeting its stated goals. The program reviews and evaluations shall subject all tobacco settlement programs to audit, whether operated directly by a state agency or by a private entity or by a local government agency.

The state auditor may contract with one or more public or private entities to conduct the program reviews and evaluations and prepare the annual executive summary reports required in subsection (5) of this section.

The joint budget committee staff, the legislative council staff, the office of legislative legal services, the department of public health and environment, and the health sciences facility shall work with the state auditor's office in conducting the program reviews and evaluations of tobacco settlement programs.

Beginning December 15, 2002, the state auditor's office shall first submit to the legislative audit committee and then to the governor, the attorney general, the department of public health and environment, the joint budget committee, and the health and human services committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, reports on the program reviews and evaluations of tobacco settlement programs performed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. In addition, the state auditor's office shall submit to the health and human services committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, and to the department of public health and environment an annual executive summary of the program reviews and evaluations.

The legislative audit committee shall design a schedule for reviewing tobacco settlement programs to ensure that each program is reviewed and evaluated as deemed necessary by the committee after consultation with the state auditor.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 593, § 3, effective May 18.

L. 2003:

(7) amended, p. 1665, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(5) and (7) amended, p. 1032, § 1, effective May 25; (6) amended, p. 315, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2010:

(7)(c) added, (HB 10-1323), ch. 35, p. 132, § 7, effective March 22; (1) and (4) amended, (SB 10-073), ch. 386, p. 1806, § 1, effective June 30.

L. 2012:

IP(7)(a) and (7)(b) amended and (7)(a.5) added, (HB12-1249), ch. 72, p. 247, § 1, effective March 24.

L. 2013:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 13-1117), ch. 169, p. 588, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(2) amended and (7) repealed, (HB 16-1408), ch. 153, pp. 461, 472, §§ 2, 26, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 825, § 18, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act amending subsection (1)(a), see section 1 of chapter 169, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

2-3-114. State records management - duties of state auditor - definitions.

For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Agency" means every department, institution, and agency of state government, including educational institutions and the judicial and legislative branches.

"Records" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 24-80-101 (1), C.R.S., and shall include a "record" as defined in section 24-71.3-102 (13), C.R.S.

The state auditor shall conduct records management audits of every agency on a periodic basis as determined by the state auditor. Such records management audits shall be conducted separately or in connection with an agency audit conducted pursuant to section 2-3-103.

The executive director of the department of personnel or the director's designee shall, in consultation with the state archivist, provide the state auditor with guidelines by September 1, 2001, for determining whether an agency is:

Managing its records in compliance with the administrative and technical procedures for records maintenance and management established pursuant to section 24-80-102 (3), C.R.S.; and

Improving the general accessibility of the records in the agency's custody.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 75, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2005:

(1)(b) amended, p. 760, § 8, effective June 1.

2-3-115. Use of state education fund money for school capital construction - audits - reports.

For the 2001-02 school district budget year and each school district budget year thereafter, for the purpose of determining the amount of state education fund moneys expended by each school district in the state for capital construction and identifying the schools and projects on which school districts expended such moneys, the state auditor shall annually examine the records of each school district in the state that received state education fund moneys for the budget year:

Directly from the department of education for capital construction aid to qualified charter schools, as defined in section 22-54-124 (1)(f.6), C.R.S., in accordance with section 22-54-124 (4), C.R.S.; or

For budget years 2000-01 through 2006-07, indirectly from the school capital construction expenditures reserve created in section 22-54-117 (1.5)(a)(I), C.R.S., as said reserve existed prior to July 1, 2008, and for the budget year 2007-08, indirectly from the school capital construction expenditures reserve fund, as said fund existed prior to July 1, 2008.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 349, § 12, effective April 16.

L. 2002:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1766, § 32, effective June 7.

L. 2003:

(1)(a) amended, p. 2139, § 40, effective May 22.

L. 2006:

(1)(a) amended, p. 594, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2007:

(1)(b), (2)(c), and (2)(e) amended, p. 630, § 5, effective April 26.

L. 2008:

(1)(b), (2)(c), and (2)(e) amended, p. 1064, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(2) repealed, (SB 21-198), ch. 135, p. 555, § 1, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as 2-3-114 in Senate Bill 01-129 but has been renumbered on revision for ease of location.

2-3-116. Performance audit of foster care program - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 752, § 1, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective December 1, 2002. (See L. 2001, p. 752.)

2-3-117. Pilot efficiency reviews - school districts - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1968, § 1, effective June 4.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5)(d) provided for the repeal of this section, effective January 1, 2005, if the school district pilot efficiency review fund did not contain any moneys as of January 1, 2005, and the state auditor notified in writing the revisor of statutes that the fund did not contain any moneys. The revisor of statutes was notified January 14, 2005, by the state auditor that the fund did not contain any moneys. (See L. 2004, p. 1968.)

2-3-118. Performance audit of statewide database of permittees - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 778, § 3, effective May 14.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2011. (See L. 2007, p. 778.)

2-3-119. Audit of healthcare affordability and sustainability fee - cost shift.

At the discretion of the legislative audit committee, the state auditor shall conduct or cause to be conducted a performance and fiscal audit of the healthcare affordability and sustainability fee established pursuant to section 25.5-4-402.4.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1293), ch. 152, p. 652, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-267), ch. 267, p. 1438, § 2, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-267, see section 1 of chapter 267, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

2-3-120. Periodic performance audits of Colorado new energy improvement district and new energy improvement program - reports.

No later than June 30, 2014, and no later than June 30 of every fifth year thereafter, the state auditor shall conduct or cause to be conducted a performance audit of the Colorado new energy improvement district created in section 32-20-104 (1), C.R.S., and the new energy improvement program established by the district pursuant to section 32-20-105 (3), C.R.S. The state auditor shall prepare a report and recommendations on each audit conducted and shall present the report and recommendations to the committee.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1328), ch. 426, p. 2220, § 2, effective June 11.

2-3-121. Performance audits of public highway authorities.

At the discretion of the legislative audit committee, the state auditor shall conduct or cause to be conducted a performance audit of any public highway authority created and operating pursuant to part 5 of article 4 of title 43. The state auditor shall prepare a report and recommendations on each audit conducted and shall present the report and recommendations to the committee. The state auditor shall pay the costs of any audit conducted pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (HB 11-1118), ch. 84, p. 228, § 1, effective March 31.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (HB 17-1005), ch. 8, p. 23, § 1, effective August 9.

2-3-122. Risk-based performance audit of department of transportation - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (SB 16-122), ch. 91, p. 255, § 1, effective April 14.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2018. (See L. 2016, p. 255.)

2-3-123. Audits of the distribution of money in the state historical fund used for the preservation and restoration of the cities of Central, Black Hawk, and Cripple Creek. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (SB 16-073), ch. 261, p. 1073, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2018:

IP(1) and (1)(b) amended, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 237, § 5, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section repealed, (HB 21-1249), ch. 178, p. 969, § 1, effective September 7.

2-3-124. Audits of reports of recidivism and educational outcomes by the division of youth services.

On or before January 1, 2019, and on or before January 1, 2024, the state auditor shall audit the reports of recidivism rates and educational outcomes for youth committed to the division of youth services in the state department of human services, prepared pursuant to section 19-2.5-1501 (4). Each such audit must examine the division's reports during the preceding five years for accuracy and quality. After January 1, 2024, the state auditor, at the auditor's discretion, may conduct additional audits of the division of youth services reports of recidivism rates and educational outcomes for youth committed to the division.

The judicial department shall provide data to the state auditor as permissible by law for the purposes of this section.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1329), ch. 381, p. 1967, § 9, effective June 6.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1010), ch. 25, p. 282, § 2, effective March 7.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 708, § 4, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2964, § 7, effective August 10.

2-3-125. Periodic performance audits of Colorado civil rights division and commission - reports.

By December 15, 2019, and by December 15, 2024, the state auditor shall complete or cause to be conducted and completed a performance audit of the Colorado civil rights division created in section 24-34-302 and the Colorado civil rights commission created in section 24-34-303. The state auditor shall prepare a report and recommendations on each audit conducted and shall present the report and recommendations to the committee.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1256), ch. 229, p. 1442, § 3, effective July 1.

2-3-126. Performance audits of Colorado electric transmission authority.

At the discretion of the legislative audit committee, the state auditor shall conduct or cause to be conducted a performance audit of the Colorado electric transmission authority created in article 42 of title 40. The state auditor shall prepare a report and recommendations on each audit conducted and shall present the report and recommendations to the committee. The state auditor shall pay the costs of any audit conducted pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-072), ch. 329, p. 2127, § 5, effective June 24.